Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-615
Funds; appropriation not required.

No previous annual appropriation of funds shall be required as a condition precedent to disbursement of any funds for the purpose of carrying out the objects of section 18-601.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 34, § 15, p. 200;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1915;

R.S.1943, § 18-615.